Vermont, session 2025-2026, H810.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE; INFORMATIONAL MATERIALS;
COVERED BRIDGES
The Secretary of Transportation, in consultation with the Secretary of
Commerce and Community Development, the Vermont League of Cities and
Towns, and, in the discretion of the Secretary of Transportation, other
stakeholders, shall:
(1) on or before November 15, 2026, develop and make available to
municipalities informational materials regarding establishing weight, height,
and width limits for covered bridges and the enhanced penalties pursuant to
23 V.S.A. § 1434(c) for persons who operate a vehicle on a covered bridge,
which exceeds the limits established for that bridge;
(2) provide technical assistance to municipalities in relation to
establishing weight, height, and width limits for covered bridges;
(3) provide information and technical assistance to municipalities
regarding the construction of barriers, warning devices, and other measures
VT LEG #386367 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.810
2026 Page 3 of 4
designed to prevent vehicles that exceed the weight, height, and width limits
for a covered bridge from being operated on the bridge; and
(4) provide information and technical assistance to municipalities in
relation to potential opportunities to obtain funding or in-kind assistance
related to the construction of barriers, warning devices, and other measures
designed to prevent vehicles that exceed the weight, height, and width limits
for a covered bridge from being operated on the bridge.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 503 is amended to read:
§ 503. SECOND DEGREE ARSON; ARSON OF A COVERED BRIDGE
(a) A person who willfully and maliciously sets fire to or burns or causes to
be burned, or who willfully and maliciously aids, counsels, or procures the
burning of any building or structure of whatsoever class or character, whether
the property of himself or herself themselves or of another, not included or
described in section 502 of this title, shall be guilty of arson in the second
degree, and shall be imprisoned not more than five years nor less than one year
or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section by committing
arson of a covered bridge shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years nor less
than two years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
VT LEG #386367 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.810
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 3733 is amended to read:
§ 3733. MILLS, DAMS OR BRIDGES
(a) A person who willfully and maliciously injures, removes, or opens a
dam, reservoir, gate, or flume or injures or removes the wheels, mill gear, or
machinery of a water mill, or injures, removes, or destroys a public or toll
bridge, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than
$500.00, or both.
(b) A person who willfully and maliciously injures, removes, or destroys a
covered bridge shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more
than $1,000.00, or both.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386367 v.2